Washington statutes.
RCW 19.320.050

Assistance information.

The department of labor and industries shall integrate information on assisting victims of human trafficking in posters and brochures, as deemed appropriate by the department. The information shall include the toll-free telephone number of the national human trafficking resource center and the Washington state office of crime victims advocacy.

[ 2010 c 142 s 4.]